Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1526
Rules and regulations; provisions applicable; exceptions.

(1) All rules and regulations adopted by the council and all hearings and other proceedings of the director, and judicial review thereof, shall be subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a hearing prior to the issuance of an emergency order pursuant to section 81-1507.

(3) Nothing in the Administrative Procedure Act shall be construed to render inapplicable or unenforceable the procedure set forth in section 81-1507. In any case of inconsistency or conflict, the provisions of section 81-1507 shall prevail.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 26;

Laws 1974, LB 1029, § 8.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.